Missouri, session 2026, HB2798.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.396, to read as follows:
9.396. November twenty-sixth each year is hereby designated as "Tina Turner
2 Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to honor the "Queen of Rock 'n Roll" whose career started when
4 she performed during the intermission of Ike Turner's shows in St. Louis night clubs.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.